Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2564.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. NEW SECTION . 135.196 Pregnancy care for minors. 1. If a parent, guardian, or legal custodian of a minor is not reasonably available, the minor shall have the legal capacity to give consent to the provision of prenatal care, intrapartum care, or postnatal care to the minor by a physician, a physicianâs designee, an advanced registered nurse practitioner, a physician assistant, a registered nurse, a licensed practical nurse, or an emergency medical care provider. House File 2564, p. 2 2. Subsection 1 shall not be construed to relieve a physician, a physicianâs designee, an advanced registered nurse practitioner, a physician assistant, a registered nurse, a licensed practical nurse, or an emergency medical care provider of the duty to obtain informed consent from the minor patient for the provision of such care. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 2564, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor